Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB329.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503(e)(2) introductory paragraph of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 503. Certification; calculation of minimum and maximum modifiers.12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *(e) Distribution.--* * *(2) For fiscal year 2009-2010 [and each fiscal year thereafter] through fiscal year 2024-2025, the secretary shall distribute the difference between the amount certified under subsection (a)(1)(i) and the sum of all of the following:* * *(3) For fiscal year 2025-2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the secretary shall distribute the difference between the amount certified under subsection (a)(1)(i) and the sum of all of the following:(i) The difference between the sum of:(A) the amount of approved claims to be paid in the next fiscal year under section 1304(a)(2)(i) and (3); and(B) the amount of approved claims paid in the 2010-2011 fiscal year under section 1304(a)(1).(ii) The sum of all of the following:(A) The amount sufficient to fund reimbursements to eligible school districts under section 324. The amount deducted under this clause shall be calculated based on the information provided by school districts under subsection (b)(2).(B) The amount of approved claims under section 704.(C) The amount of approved claims under section 1304(a)(2)(ii).(D) The amount of payments to school districts 20250HB0329PN0284 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 504.1.Section 2. Section 504(d)(1) of the act is amended to read:Section 504. Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund.* * *(d) Transfers.--(1) The secretary may authorize a transfer from the Property Tax Relief Reserve Fund to the fund if the amount for distribution under section 503(e) in 2026 is less than the amount for distribution under section 503(e) [made in the prior year] in 2025 or any year thereafter. [The] Beginning in 2027 and each year thereafter, the amount of the transfer under this subsection shall be equal to the difference between the amount for distribution under section 503(e) and the amount for distribution under section 503(e) made in the prior year.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 504.1. Senior citizen tax relief.(a) Tax freeze.--An eligible claimant shall be entitled to a freeze of school property taxes imposed by a school district on the person's homestead and shall not be required to pay any school property tax increases in excess of the claimant's base payment.(b) Application.--An eligible claimant must apply for the tax freeze under subsection (a) by filing the following with the school district imposing the school property tax on a form prescribed by the department:(1) A request for the tax freeze and a copy of the most recent school property tax bill.(2) Certification that the claimant or the claimant's 20250HB0329PN0284 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 spouse is the owner of the homestead upon which the school property taxes are imposed.(3) Receipts showing prompt payment of the current year's school property tax liability.(c) Timing.--(1) The application under subsection (b) must be filed within 45 days of the date the school property tax under subsection (b)(1) is due.(2) Within 15 days of receipt of an application, the school district shall determine the claimant to be eligible or ineligible. A determination of ineligibility under this paragraph is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. B (relating to judicial review of local agency action).(d) Termination.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), the tax rate on and the assessment of school property tax shall become current on the sale or transfer of the real property subject to the tax, including a transfer under a recorded real property sales contract.(2) A tax freeze under this section shall remain in effect upon the transfer of the affected real property to a surviving spouse if, at the time of the death of the claimant, the surviving spouse is at least 65 years of age or will be 65 years of age within six months of the date of death of the claimant.(e) Commonwealth payment.--(1) Beginning April 2025 and each April thereafter, the secretary shall pay school districts, from the fund, the amount of each eligible claimant's school property tax increase in excess of the claimant's base payment. Payments 20250HB0329PN0284 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section shall be made prior to any distribution of funds under section 504(c).(2) The school district shall provide notification and documentation to the department of the total balance due to the local taxing authorities for school property tax increases for eligible claimants.(3) The department shall certify the total amount due to school property tax increases for each school district.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Base payment."(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the amount of school property tax paid by the eligible claimant either in the tax year beginning January 1, 2025, or in the first tax year during which the claimant first becomes eligible, whichever occurs later, on the principal residence in which the claimant has maintained continuous occupancy and ownership since either January 1, 2025, or the date the claimant first becomes eligible.(2) If the claimant purchases a principal residence after January 1, 2025, or after the date on which the claimant first becomes eligible, the amount of school property tax paid during the tax year in which the purchase was made."Base year." The tax year under paragraph (1) or (2) of the definition of "base payment.""Eligible claimant." An individual who meets all of the following for the base year and each succeeding year up to and including the year for which the freeze is sought:20250HB0329PN0284 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Was at least 65 years of age or whose spouse, if a member of the household, was at least 65 years of age during the base year.(2) Has held a homestead exemption for the previous five years.(3) Has paid the full amount of property taxes due for each succeeding year up to and including the year for which the freeze is sought."Homestead." As defined in section 302."School property tax." The property tax levied by a school district on the homestead of an eligible claimant. The term does not include a penalty, interest or a payment made in lieu of tax."School property tax increase." The increase in school property tax levied in a calendar year over school property tax levied in the base year.Section 4. Section 505(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 505. State property tax reduction allocation.(a) Administration.--The department shall do all of the following:* * *(2.1) Prior to calculating the property tax reduction under paragraph (3), the department shall calculate the amount due to school districts under section 504.1.* * *(a.1) Initial payment.--For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2025, and July 1 of each year thereafter, prior to making a payment under subsection (b), the department shall pay to each 20250HB0329PN0284 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school district the amount due under section 504.1(e).* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0329PN0284 - 7 - 123